Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Storage of Explosives

§ 35-10-301.
General regulations.

It shall be unlawful for any person or company to store any gunpowder or any other explosive material at a less distance than one thousand (1,000) feet from any house or habitation, when more than fifty (50) pounds are stored at the same place; but it shall be unlawful to place or to keep any powder or other explosive material, in any house or building occupied as a residence, or any outbuilding pertaining thereto.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 27, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1950; R.S. 1899, § 2256; C.S. 1910, § 2964; Laws 1919, ch. 17, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3650; R.S. 1931, § 40-101; C.S. 1945, § 9-1301; W.S. 1957, § 35-476.

Cross references. —

As to use of explosives in mining, see §§

30-2-501

to

30-2-607

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Injury to child finding or having access to explosives, 10 ALR2d 22.

Contributory negligence as a defense to a cause of action based upon violation of statute relating to explosives or volatile oils, 10 ALR2d 853.

Manufacturer or wholesaler, liability for injury caused by a third person's use of explosives or other dangerous articles sold to retailer in violation of law, 11 ALR2d 1028.

Negligence of building or construction contractor in connection with explosives as ground of liability upon his part for injury or damage to third person occurring after completion and acceptance of the work, 13 ALR2d 191, 58 ALR2d 865.

Municipal liability for injury due to explosion of substance stored by third persons under municipal permit, 17 ALR2d 683.

Liability of seller of firearm, explosive, or highly inflammable substance to child, 20 ALR2d 119, 75 ALR3d 825, 95 ALR3d 390, 4 ALR4th 331.

Liability for property damage by concussion from blasting, 20 ALR2d 1372.

Admissibility, in damage action arising out of explosion or blasting, of evidence of damage to other property in vicinity, 45 ALR2d 1121.

Duty of possessor of land to warn adult licensee of danger of explosion, 55 ALR2d 525.

Admissibility of experimental evidence as to explosion, 76 ALR2d 402.

Criminal offense of bomb hoax or making false report as to planting of explosive, 93 ALR2d 304, 45 ALR4th 949.

Liability for injury or damage caused by rocket testing or firing, 29 ALR3d 556.

Liability in connection with fire or explosion of explosives while being stored or transported, 35 ALR3d 1177.

Absolute liability for blasting operations as extending to injury or damage not immediately caused by debris or concussion from explosion, 56 ALR3d 1017.

Recovery of damages for emotional distress, fright, and the like, resulting from blasting operations, 75 ALR3d 770.

Criminal liability for transportation of explosives and other dangerous articles under 18 U.S.C. §§ 831-835 and implementing regulations, 8 ALR Fed 816.

What constitutes “hazardous substance” under 15 U.S.C. § 1261 (f), and what acts involving hazardous substances are prohibited under 15 U.S.C. § 1263, 29 ALR Fed 742.

Admissibility, in trial for federal offense involving malicious use of explosives (under 18 USC § 844), of evidence of taggants embedded in explosives, 70 ALR Fed 906.

§ 35-10-302.
Construction of powder magazine.

Hereafter, any powder magazine that may be built, shall be so constructed as to provide and maintain the storage room thereof, entirely below the natural surface of the ground adjacent; and it shall be unlawful to store such powder or explosives in any other than such storage rooms.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 27, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1951; R.S. 1899, § 2257; C.S. 1910, § 2965; C.S. 1920, § 3651; R.S. 1931, § 40-102; C.S. 1945, § 9-1302; W.S. 1957, § 35-477.

§ 35-10-303.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 35-10-301; violation of W.S. 35-10-302 declared nuisance.

Anyone violating the provisions of W.S.

35-10-301

shall be on conviction, fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each and every offense, and may be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both fined and imprisoned, in the discretion of the court having jurisdiction. Any violation of the provisions of W.S.

35-10-302

shall be a public nuisance, and shall be abated at the suit of any person, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 27, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1952; R.S. 1899, § 2258; C.S. 1910, § 2966; C.S. 1920, § 3652; R.S. 1931, § 40-103; C.S. 1945, § 9-1303; W.S. 1957, § 35-478.

Cross references. —

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.